District of Columbia statutes.
2-1212.32

Requirements.

(a)

Corner stores, farmers markets, and other small food retailers participating in the program established by § 2-1212.31 shall be strongly encouraged to:

(1)

Apply to accept SNAP benefits;

(2)

Apply to accept WIC benefits; and

(3)

Employ District residents.

(b)

Resources may be provided under § 2-1212.31 to assist corner stores, farmers markets, and other small food retailers in acquiring the technology necessary to accept SNAP and WIC benefits.

(c)

As a condition of participating in the program established by § 2-1212.31, individuals or entities operating corner stores, farmers markets, and other small food retailers shall agree in writing to sell produce or other healthy foods for at least 3 years; provided, that this requirement shall not be enforceable if the individual or entity, or its successor, ceases all of its retail food sales operations.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-353, § 302, 58 DCR 746